District of Columbia statutes.
1-204.114

When official removed; filling of vacancies.

An elected official is removed from office if a majority of the qualified electors voting in the election vote to remove him or her. The vacancy created by such recall shall be filled in the same manner as other vacancies as provided in §§ 1-204.01(d) and 1-204.21(c)(2) and § 1-1001.10(a).

Mar. 10, 1978, D.C. Law 2-46, § 2, 24 DCR 199

History

1981 Ed., § 1-294.
1973 Ed., § 1-194.

Prior Codifications